Washington statutes.
RCW 41.12.210

Penalty—Jurisdiction.

Any person who shall wilfully violate any of the provisions of this chapter shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not more than one hundred dollars and by imprisonment in the county jail for not longer than thirty days, or by both such fine and imprisonment. The court of original and unlimited jurisdiction in civil suits shall have jurisdiction of all such offenses defined by this chapter.

[ 1937 c 13 s 23; RRS s 9558a-23.]